Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB918.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Half of the roadway." All traffic lanes conveying traffic in one direction of travel and the entire width of a one-way 1234567891011121314151617181920 roadway.* * *Section 2. Section 3112(a) of Title 75 is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3112. Traffic-control signals.(a) General rule.--Whenever traffic is controlled by traffic-control signals exhibiting different colored lights, or colored lighted arrows, successively one at a time or in combination, only the colors green, red and yellow shall be used, except for special pedestrian signals carrying a word legend, and the lights shall indicate and apply to drivers of vehicles and pedestrians as follows:* * *(4) Pedestrians lawfully within intersection or adjacent crosswalk.--The driver of a vehicle required to yield the right-of-way to pedestrians lawfully within the intersection or an adjacent crosswalk shall stop and remain stopped for a pedestrian crossing a roadway at a crosswalk when the pedestrian is upon, or within one lane of, the half of the roadway upon which the vehicle is traveling or onto which the vehicle is turning.* * *(d) Penalties.--A driver of a vehicle who violates this section commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay:(1) Except as specified under paragraph (2), a fine of $50.(2) For a violation of subsection (a), a fine of not less than $200 if the violation occurred in a school zone as 20250HB0918PN0967 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 defined and established under regulations of the department.Section 3. Section 3113(c) of Title 75 is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 3113. Pedestrian-control signals.* * *(a.1) Duty of driver.--The driver of a vehicle required to yield the right-of-way to a pedestrian under subsection (a)(1), (3) or (4) shall stop and remain stopped to allow a pedestrian to cross the roadway within a crosswalk when the pedestrian is upon, or within one lane of, the half of the roadway upon which the vehicle is traveling or onto which the vehicle is turning.* * *(c) Penalties.--[The driver of a vehicle who violates subsection (a) commits a summary offense and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of $50. This subsection] A driver of a vehicle who violates this section commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay:(1) Except as specified under paragraph (2), a fine of $50.(2) For a violation of subsection (a), a fine of not less than $200 if the violation occurred in a school zone as defined and established under regulations of the department.(d) Applicability.--Subsection (c) shall not apply to those municipalities that establish a summary offense as authorized under subsection (b) with a fine in excess of $50.Section 4. Section 3542(a) and (e) of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 3542. Right-of-way of pedestrians in crosswalks.(a) General rule.--When traffic-control signals are not in place or not in operation, the driver of a vehicle shall yield 20250HB0918PN0967 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the right-of-way to a pedestrian crossing the roadway within any marked crosswalk or within any unmarked crosswalk at an intersection. The driver of a vehicle shall stop and remain stopped to allow a pedestrian to cross the roadway within a marked crosswalk or within an unmarked crosswalk at an intersection when the pedestrian is upon, or within one lane of, the half of the roadway upon which the vehicle is traveling or onto which the vehicle is turning.* * *(e) Penalties.--[The driver of a vehicle who violates subsection (a) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $50.] A driver of a vehicle who violates this section commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay:(1) Except as specified under paragraph (2), a fine of $50.(2) For a violation of subsection (a), a fine of not less than $200 if the violation occurred in a school zone as defined and established under regulations of the department.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0918PN0967 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920